Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2531
General obligation bonds.

Any joint public agency may from time to time issue its bonds in such principal amounts as its board determines is necessary to provide sufficient funds to carry out any of the joint public agency's purposes and powers, including the establishment or increase of reserves, the payment of interest accrued during construction of a project and for such period thereafter as the board may determine, and the payment of all other costs or expenses of the joint public agency incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and powers. Except as provided in section 72-2304, bonds issued prior to April 18, 2018, for purposes of the Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act may be issued with no requirement for a vote. Bonds issued on or after April 18, 2018, for purposes of the Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act shall be subject to a vote prior to issuance as provided in the act.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 31;

Laws 2005, LB 217, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB1000, § 2.

Public Facilities Construction and Finance Act, see section 72-2301.